Hawaii statutes.
[§449-22] Examinations. (a) The
commissioner may conduct examinations of escrow depositories as often as the
commissioner deems necessary for the purpose of assuring that the escrow
depository is in compliance with all laws, rules, or orders issued by the
commissioner.

(b) The commissioner shall have full access to
the vaults, books, and papers of the escrow depository and may make such
inquiries as may be necessary to ascertain the condition of the corporation.
All directors, incorporators, officers, employees, and agents of an institution
being examined shall cooperate fully with the commissioner and the
commissioner's examiners, and shall answer all inquiries and furnish all
information pertaining to the same, to the best of their knowledge and ability.

(c) The licensee shall bear the expenses of
any examination or investigation by the commissioner. [L 1992, c 205, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next